North Dakota, session 69, HB1320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 12.1-31 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Fraudulent use of deepfake videos or images.
1. As used in this section, "deepfake video or image" means any video or audio
recording, motion picture film, electronic image, or photograph digitally altered or
created by artificial intelligence with the intent to deceive, which depicts an individual's
image or voice that did not occur in reality, and in which the individual's appearance in
the video recording, motion picture, electronic image, or photograph is a result of
digitization or artificial intelligence.
2. It is a class A misdemeanor for a person to intentionally produce, possess, distribute,
promote, advertise, sell, exhibit, broadcast, or transmit a deepfake video or image
without consent of the individual appearing in the deepfake video or image.
3. A person that violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor .
Page No. 1 25.0912.01000